Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1901
Legislative intent.

The Legislature hereby finds that the state prohibits the use of smokeless tobacco products by minors and the furnishing of smokeless tobacco products to minors and that the enforcement of an age-related restriction on the promotional distribution of smokeless tobacco products is impractical and ineffective. It is the intent of the Legislature to control the distribution of these products and discourage illegal activity by prohibiting all promotional distribution.

Laws 1989, LB 48, § 1.